05_Project/adjectives.lexc
! The main morphological differences between LF and SF
! are in verbs and personal pronouns
! e.g. the use of "ils" in the plural regardless of gender
! But I'm focusing on nouns for now because that's easier to start with

Multichar_Symbols

%<adj%>			! Adjective
%<noun%>		! Noun

%<sg%>			! singular
%<pl%>			! plural

%<m%>			! masculine
%<f%>			! feminine

%{e%}			! feminine adjective ending
%{s%}			! plural ending

%>				! morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Adjectives;
Nouns;

! Generate masculine & feminine form of adjectives
LEXICON Adj
%<m%>: Number;
%<f%>: %>%{e%} Number;

! For adjectives whose masculine and feminine forms are identical
LEXICON AdjMF
%<m%>: Number;
%<f%>: Number;

! For invariable adjectives
LEXICON AdjI
%<m%>%<sg%>: #;
%<f%>%<sg%>: #;
%<m%>%<pl%>: #;
%<f%>%<pl%>: #;

! Generate singular & plural forms
! of adjectives, nouns, etc.
LEXICON Number
%<sg%>: #;
%<pl%>: %>%{s%} #;

LEXICON Adjectives
anglais%<adj%>:anglais Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "English"
autre%<adj%>:autre AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "other"
attendu%<adj%>:attendu AdjMF;		! ADJECTIVE "understood, agreed"
bête%<adj%>:bête AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "foolish, crazy"
bon%<adj%>:bon Adj;					! ADJECTIVE "good, nice, well-behaved, correct" -nne
bien%<adj%>:bien AdjI;				! ADJECTIVE "good, well, correct"
bas%<adj%>:bas Adj;					! ADJECTIVE "low, shallow, mean" -sse
cassé%<adj%>:cassé Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "broken; broke; well-dressed"
cadien%<adj%>:cadien Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "Cajun" -nne
cochon%<adj%>:cochon Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "dirty; nasty"
chaque%<adj%>:chaque AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "each, every"
clos%<adj%>:clos Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "enclosed, closed; sealed"
content%<adj%>:content Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "happy; content"
chaud%<adj%>:chaud Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "hot; angry"
cent%<adj%>:cent AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE/NOUN M "a hundred"
cinq%<adj%>:cinq AdjI;				! ADJECTIVE/NOUN M "five"
décidé%<adj%>:décidé Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "determined, resolved, decided"
défunt%<adj%>:défunt Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "deceased, defunct"
droite%<adj%>: droite AdjMF;		! ADJECTIVE "right"
droite%<adj%>: drète AdjMF;
droite%<adj%>: drouète AdjMF;
droite%<adj%>: drette AdjMF;
dur%<adj%>:dur Adj;					! ADJECTIVE "hard"
emmené%<adj%>:emmené Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "____behaved"
fâché%<adj%>:fâché Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "angry, mad"
faible%<adj%>:faible AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "weak, faint"
fini%<adj%>:fini Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "skillful; elegant; thin" 
fort%<adj%>:fort Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "strong, powerful"
français%<adj%>:français Adj;		! ADJECTIVE "French"
froid%<adj%>:froid Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "cold"
gâté%<adj%>:gâté Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "spoiled"
grand%<adj%>:grand Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "big, large"
haut%<adj%>:haut Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "high, tall"
intéressant%<adj%>:intéressant Adj;	! ADJECTIVE "interesting"
jaune%<adj%>:jaune AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "yellow; golden brown; khaki"
jeune%<adj%>:jeune AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "young"
joli%<adj%>:joli Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "pretty; nice"
juste%<adj%>:juste AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "just, right"
malade%<adj%>:malade AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "sick"
mauvais%<adj%>:mauvais Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "bad, mean, malicious"
meilleur%<adj%>:meilleur Adj;		! ADJECTIVE "better, favorite, best" -e not -euse
même%<adj%>:même AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "same"
mille%<adj%>:mille AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "thousand"
mort%<adj%>:mort Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "dead"
noir%<adj%>:noir Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "dark, tragic; black"
parent%<adj%>:parent AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "related, kin"
passé%<adj%>:passé Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "past, previous; ago"
pauvre%<adj%>:pauvre AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "poor"
petit%<adj%>:petit Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "small, little; young"
petit%<adj%>:pitit Adj;
petit%<adj%>:p'tit Adj;
petit%<adj%>:'tit Adj;
plein%<adj%>:plein Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "full; pregnant; covered"
plusieurs%<adj%>:plusieurs AdjMF;	! ADJECTIVE "several, some"
premier%<adj%>:premier Adj;			! ADJECTIVE "first, primary" ADD PHON RULE FOR -ère
pris%<adj%>:pris Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "occupied; started"
seul%<adj%>:seul Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "only; single"
triste%<adj%>:triste AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "sad"
cher%<adj%>:cher Adj;					! ADJECTIVE "dear, beloved; expensive"
dernier%<adj%>:dernier Adj;				! ADJECTIVE "last" -ière
doux%<adj%>%<m%>:doux Number;			! ADJECTIVE "sweet" -ce
long%<adj%>%<m%>:long Number;			! ADJECTIVE "long" -ue
neuf%<adj%>:neuf Adj;					! ADJECTIVE "new" -ve
quel%<adj%>%<m%>: quel Number;
quelque%<adj%>:quelque AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE INDEFINITE "some"
quelque%<adj%>:quèque AdjMF;
leur%<adj%>:leur AdjMF;					! ADJECTIVE DEMONSTRATIVE "this, that, these, those"
demi%<adj%>:demi AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "half"
deux%<adj%>:deux AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "two"
deuxième%<adj%>:deuxième AdjMF;		! ADJECTIVE "second"
dix%<adj%>:dix AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "ten"
dix-huit%<adj%>:dix-huit AdjMF;		! ADJECTIVE"eighteen"
dix-neuf%<adj%>:dix-neuf AdjMF;		! ADJECTIVE "nineteen"
douze%<adj%>:douze AdjMF;			! ADJECTIVE "twelve"
dû%<adj%>:dû AdjMF;					! ADJECTIVE "expected, due"
gone%<adj%>:gone AdjMF; 			! ADJECTIVE "gone, absent"
huit%<adj%>:huit AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "eight"
neuf%<adj%>:neuf AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "nine"
onze%<adj%>:onze AdjMF;				! ADJECTIVE "eleven"
ok%<adj%>:ok AdjI;					! ADJECTIVE "OK"
LEXICON Nouns
boutique%<noun%>%<f%>:boutique Number;		! NOUN F "any store; grocery store; boutique"
chance%<noun%>%<f%>:chance Number;			! NOUN F "chance, risk; luck; opportunity"
cheminée%<noun%>%<f%>:cheminée Number;		! NOUN F "chimney; fireplace; mantlepiece; lamp glass"
cuisine%<noun%>%<f%>:cuisine Number;		! NOUN F "kitchen" also cusine
différence%<noun%>%<f%>:différence Number;	! NOUN F "difference"
droite%<noun%>%<f%>: drette Number;
envie%<noun%>%<f%>:envie Number;			! NOUN F "desire, longing, wish"
fille%<noun%>%<f%>:fille Number;			! NOUN F "girl; daughter"
graisse%<noun%>%<f%>:graisse Number;		! NOUN F "grease"
histoire%<noun%>%<f%>:histoire Number;		! NOUN F "history; story"
licence%<noun%>%<f%>:licence Number;		! NOUN F "license, permit; license plate"
maison%<noun%>%<f%>:maison Number;			! NOUN F "house, home"
mame%<noun%>%<f%>:mame Number;				! NOUN F "mama, mom; Mrs., madam"
messe%<noun%>%<f%>:messe Number;			! NOUN F "Mass"
née%<noun%>%<f%>:née Number;				! NOUN F "maiden name"
patate%<noun%>%<f%>:patate Number;			! NOUN F "potato"
piastre%<noun%>%<f%>:piastre Number;		! NOUN F "dollar; silver dollar fish"
place%<noun%>%<f%>:place Number;			! NOUN F "place; room"
prière%<noun%>%<f%>:prière Number;			! NOUN F "prayer"
sœur%<noun%>%<f%>:sœur Number;				! NOUN F "sister; nun";
terre%<noun%>%<f%>:terre Number;			! NOUN F "earth"
vie%<noun%>%<f%>:vie Number;				! NOUN F "life
arrière%<noun%>%<m%>:arrière Number;		! NOUN M "back, hind" (used in expressions mostly)
baril%<noun%>%<m%>:baril Number;			! NOUN M "barrel, pulpit"
bayou%<noun%>%<m%>:bayou Number;			! NOUN M "bayou, stream"
bien%<noun%>%<m%>:bien Number;				! NOUN M "good, property"
boudin%<noun%>%<m%>:boudin Number;			! NOUN M "boudin"
brin%<noun%>%<m%>:brin Number;				! NOUN M "blade of grass, straw of broom; gauze, cheesecloth"
char%<noun%>%<m%>:char Number;				! NOUN M "car, train"
chose%<noun%>%<m%>:chose Number;			! NOUN M "what's-his-name"
combien%<noun%>%<m%>:combien Number;		! NOUN M "date"
coup%<noun%>%<m%>:coup Number;				! NOUN M "hit; time; prank; drink/shot"
dessous%<noun%>%<m%>:dessous Number;		! NOUN M "bottom"
dimanche%<noun%>%<m%>:dimanche Number;		! NOUN M "Sunday"
écrevisse%<noun%>%<m%>:écrevisse Number;	! NOUN M "crawfish"
fort%<noun%>%<m%>:fort Number;				! NOUN M "fortification, fort"
gris-gris%<noun%>%<m%>:gris-gris Number;	! NOUN M "amulet; spell; evil spirit"
lendemain%<noun%>%<m%>:lendemain Number;	! NOUN M "next day, tomorrow"
manger%<noun%>%<m%>:manger Number;			! NOUN M "food"
mois%<noun%>%<m%>:mois Number;				! NOUN M "month"
non%<noun%>%<m%>:non Number;				! NOUN M "no"
parent%<noun%>%<m%>:parent Number;			! NOUN M "parent; relative"
plancher%<noun%>%<m%>:plancher Number;		! NOUN M "flooring"
riz%<noun%>%<m%>:riz Number;				! NOUN M "rice"
soir%<noun%>%<m%>:soir Number;				! NOUN M "evening"
tête%<noun%>%<m%>:tête Number;				! NOUN M "breast"
wagon%<noun%>%<m%>:wagon Number;			! NOUN M "wagon"
trois%<noun%>%<m%>:trois Number;			! NOUN M "three"
ami%<noun%>:ami Adj;							! NOUN M/F "friend"
Anglais%<noun%>:Anglais Adj;					! NOUN M/F "English person"
Cadien%<noun%>:Cadien Adj;						! NOUN M/F "Cajun"
canard%<noun%>:canard Adj;						! NOUN M/F "duck"
cher%<noun%>:cher Adj;							! NOUN M/F "dear"
défunt%<noun%>:défunt Adj;						! NOUN "the deceased, the departed"
dernier%<noun%>:dernier Adj;					! NOUN "last one"
marié%<noun%>:marié Adj;						! NOUN M/F "groom"
petit%<noun%>:petit Adj;						! NOUN M/F "child" also pitit, p’tit, ‘tit
ours%<noun%>:ours Adj;							! NOUN M/F "bear"
accordéon%<noun%>%<f%>:accordéon Number;
après-midi%<noun%>%<f%>:après-midi Number;
électricité%<noun%>%<f%>:électricité Number;
musique%<noun%>%<f%>:musique Number;
terre%<noun%>%<f%>:terre Number;
